Arkansas, session 2025, HB1691.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 5, provides that
buildings, grounds, and materials used exclusively for public charity
purposes are exempt from property tax;
(2) The Assessment Coordination Division has recognized that
motor vehicles owned by public charities and used exclusively for the
purposes of public charity are exempt from personal property tax as materials
of public charity;
(3) The General Assembly has provided flexibility for the state
and local governments to determine if a vehicle belonging to the state or a
local government should be leased or purchased;
(4) A motor vehicle as defined in § 26-52-103 that belongs to
*JLL270*
03-19-2025 14:18:15 JLL270

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1691
the state or a local government and is subject to a lease of at least twelve
(12) months is exempt from taxation; and
(5) For the purpose of the personal property tax exemption, the
General Assembly should extend the same flexibility to public charities to
determine if a motor vehicle that belongs to a public charity and is used
exclusively for purposes of the public charity should be leased or purchased.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-3-301(7), concerning property that is
exempt from tax, is amended to read as follows:
(7) All buildings belonging to institutions of purely public
charity, together with the land actually occupied by these institutions, not
leased or otherwise used with a view to profit, and all moneys and credits
appropriated solely to sustaining, and belonging exclusively to, these
institutions, and motor vehicles, as defined in § 26-52-103, that are used
exclusively for purposes of public charity and are subject to a lease of at
least twelve (12) months by an institution of public charity;

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this act is effective for
assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

/s/Torres















03-19-2025 14:18:15 JLL270